Wisconsin, session 2025, AB631.
do enact as follows:AB631,11Section 1. 16.311 of the statutes is created to read:AB631,2,2216.311 Structured camping facilities. (1) Definitions. In this section: AB631,2,33(a) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county. AB631,3,24(b) “Public property” means any real property, other than county fairgrounds 1and public parks, that is owned, leased, or occupied by a state agency or a political 2subdivision. AB631,3,63(c) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 4commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state 5government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, 6except the legislature and the courts. AB631,3,97(d) “Structured camping facility” means public property that the department 8under sub. (2) (a) or a political subdivision under sub. (2) (c) 1. designates for use 9under this section.AB631,3,1210(2) Designation of structured camping facilities. (a) Subject to pars. (b) 11and (d), the department may designate any public property for use as a structured 12camping facility. AB631,3,1513(b) Except as provided in pars. (c) and (d), the department may not designate 14public property of a political subdivision for use as a structured camping facility 15without the approval of the political subdivision. AB631,3,2016(c) 1. If a resident of a political subdivision petitions the political subdivision 17to designate public property of the political subdivision as a structured camping 18facility, the political subdivision may designate any public property of the political 19subdivision as a structured camping facility and shall provide the department with 20notice of the designation. AB631,4,5212. If a political subdivision fails to designate any public property of the 22political subdivision as a structured camping facility within 12 months after a 23petition is filed with the political subdivision under subd. 1., the department may 24designate any public property of the political subdivision as a structured camping 1facility in response to the petition without the approval of the political subdivision, 2but only if the political subdivision had a homeless population above the per capita 3statewide average for political subdivisions in any of the immediately preceding 2 4statewide counts of the homeless population in the state, as determined by the 5department.AB631,4,106(d) Notwithstanding the requirements under par. (c), if at any time 12 or more 7individuals are listed on a waiting list under sub. (3) (c) in a single political 8subdivision, the department shall immediately designate public property of the 9political subdivision as a structured camping facility for the purpose of assigning 10the individuals listed on the waiting list to the structured camping facility.AB631,4,1611(3) Use of structured camping facilities. (a) The department may assign 12to a homeless individual or family a specific location at a structured camping 13facility for the purpose of allowing the individual or family to set up temporary 14residence at the facility. The department may allow homeless individuals and 15families assigned to a structured camping facility to bring camping equipment and 16other personal items onto the facility.AB631,4,2017(b) The department shall condition temporary residence at a structured 18camping facility under par. (a) on the completion of mental health or substance use 19evaluations, as prescribed by the department, and may expel individuals who fail to 20comply with department instructions.AB631,5,221(c) If the department is unable to assign to a homeless individual or family a 22specific location at a structured camping facility under par. (a) because all 23structured camping facilities in the applicable political subdivision are at capacity, 24the department shall place the homeless individual or family on a waiting list until 1a location at a structured camping facility within the political subdivision becomes 2available.AB631,5,53(d) The department shall provide for public safety at each structured camping 4facility and shall ensure that potable water and adequate sanitary facilities are 5available at each structured camping facility.AB631,5,76(4) Data collection. The department shall collect monthly data on the 7utilization of structured camping facilities, including all of the following:AB631,5,98(a) The total number of individuals residing at each structured camping 9facility.AB631,5,1110(b) The number of new individuals who set up temporary residence at each 11structured camping facility.AB631,5,1312(c) The number of individuals who ceased residence at each structured 13camping facility.AB631,5,1614(d) The number of referrals for mental health or substance use services 15resulting from evaluations completed under sub. (3) (b) at each structured camping 16facility.AB631,5,1817(e) The number of expulsions from each structured camping facility for failure 18to comply with department instructions under sub. (3) (b).AB631,219Section 2. 943.135 of the statutes is created to read:AB631,5,2120943.135 Unauthorized camping on public property; trespass. (1) In 21this section, “public property” has the meaning given in s. 16.311 (1) (b).AB631,6,422(2) No person may set up a temporary habitation on public property that is 23not designated as a recreational camping area or designated as a structured 24camping facility under s. 16.311 unless the temporary habitation is consistent with 1the normal, customary, or temporarily designated usage of the public property. A 2person who violates this subsection is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor for a 2nd or 3subsequent violation and, for a first violation, shall be given notice of the penalty for 4a 2nd or subsequent violation but may not be subject to a penalty.AB631,6,85(3) A person who has set up a temporary habitation on public property that is 6designated as a structured camping facility under s. 16.311 violates sub. (2) if the 7person does not comply with instructions or conditions provided by the department 8of administration.AB631,6,109(4) Unless sub. (3) applies, sub. (2) may not be enforced if the person has been 10placed on a waiting list under s. 16.311 (3) (c).AB631,6,1111